Louisiana, session 2026, HB272.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:4033.1(B)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 17:4033.1(B)(5) and (C)(7) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4033.1. R.E.A.D. Program; establishment; student eligibility; administration;
funding
* * *
B. A public school student who falls into at least one of the following
categories is eligible to participate in the program:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-937 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 272
(5) The student is enrolled in an elementary school that received a school
performance letter grade of "D" or "F" for the most recent school year pursuant to
the school and district accountability system as provided in R.S. 17:10.1.
C. The department shall administer and provide for the implementation of
the program. In administering the program, the department shall:
* * *
(7)(a) Provide for the quarterly shipment of books directly to each school
meeting the criteria provided in Paragraph (B)(5) of this Section, which shall ensure
that the books, along with supplemental family literacy resources designed to support
at-home reading engagement, are distributed to each student in prekindergarten
through fifth grade.
(b) Determine the specific content and format of the family literacy
resources required by Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
* * *